Nevada, session 83, AB310.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to The Immigrant Home Foundation for providing
mental health services and legal assistance to victims of domestic
violence the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $250,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $250,000
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
The Immigrant Home Foundation agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
-
*AB310*

– 2 –
from the date on which the money was received by The Immigrant
Home Foundation through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by The Immigrant
Home Foundation through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of The Immigrant Home Foundation, regardless of their
form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to
conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated by
subsection 1.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB310*